California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) Persons employed as special investigators of the Contractors State License Board and designated by the Director of Consumer Affairs shall have the authority to issue a written notice to appear in court pursuant to Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. An employee so designated is
 not a peace officer and does not have the power of arrest.

(c) When participating in the activities of the Joint Enforcement Strike Force on the Underground Economy pursuant to Section 329 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, the enforcement division shall have free access to all places of labor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 6.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7011.5.

Persons employed as investigators of the Special Investigations Unit of the Contractors State License Board and designated by the Director of Consumer Affairs have the authority of peace officers while engaged in exercising the powers granted or performing the duties imposed upon them in investigating the laws administered by the Contractors State License Board or commencing directly or indirectly any criminal prosecution arising from any investigation conducted under these laws. All persons herein referred to shall be deemed to be acting within the scope of employment with respect to all acts and matters in this section set forth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 50.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7011.7.

(a) The registrar shall review and investigate complaints filed in a manner consistent with this chapter and the Budget Act. It is the intent of the Legislature that complaints be reviewed and investigated as promptly as resources allow.

(b) The board shall set as a goal the improvement of its disciplinary system so that an average of no more than six months elapses from the receipt of a complaint to the completion of an investigation.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the goal for completing the review and investigation of complaints that, in the opinion of the board, involve complex fraud issues or complex contractual arrangements, should be no more than one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1005, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7011.8.

(a) Any person subject to licensure under this chapter who reports to, or causes a complaint to be filed with, the Contractors State License Board that a person licensed by that entity has engaged in professional misconduct, knowing the report or complaint to be false, may be issued a citation by the registrar.

(b) The board may notify the appropriate district attorney or city attorney that a person subject to licensure under this chapter has made or filed what the entity believes to be a false report or complaint against a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 51.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7012.

The registrar, with the approval of the board and the director, may, when funds are available, cooperate in the enforcement of governmental legislation relating to the construction industry, and, except as provided by Section 159.5, shall appoint such assistants as may be necessary therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

7013.

The board may in its discretion review and sustain or reverse by a majority vote any action or decision of the registrar.

This section shall apply to any action, decision, order, or proceeding of the registrar conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 410.)
-------------------------------------------

7013.5.

In all application, citation, or disciplinary proceedings pursuant to this chapter and conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the testimony of a witness given in any contested civil or criminal action or special proceeding, in any state or before any governmental body or agency, to which the licensee or person complained against is a party, or in whose behalf the action or proceeding is prosecuted or defended, may be received in evidence, so far as relevant
 and material to the issues in the proceedings, by means of a duly authenticated transcript of that testimony and without proof of the unavailability of the witness; provided that the registrar may order the production of and testimony by that witness, in lieu of or in addition to receiving a transcript of his or her testimony and may decline to receive in evidence the transcript of testimony, in whole or in part, when it appears that the testimony was given under circumstances that did not require or allow an opportunity for full cross-examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7014.

The board may procure equipment and records necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7015.

The board shall adopt a seal for its own use. The seal shall have the words “Contractors State License Board, State of California, Department of Consumer Affairs,” and the care and custody thereof shall be in the hands of the registrar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 52.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7016.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1645.)
-------------------------------------------

7017.3.

The Contractors State License Board shall report annually to the Legislature, not later than October 1 of each year, the following statistical information for the prior fiscal year. The following data shall be reported on complaints filed with the board against licensed contractors, registered home improvement salespersons, and unlicensed persons acting as licensees or registrants:

(a) The number of complaints received by the board categorized by source, such as public, trade, profession, government agency, or board-initiated, and by type of complaint, such as licensee or nonlicensee.

(b) The number of complaints closed prior to referral for field investigation, categorized by the reason for the closure, such as settled,
 referred for mandatory arbitration, or referred for voluntary arbitration.

(c) The number of complaints referred for field investigation categorized by the type of complaint, such as licensee or nonlicensee.

(d) The number of complaints closed after referral for field investigation categorized by the reason for the closure, such as settled, referred for mandatory arbitration, or referred for voluntary arbitration.

(e) For the board’s Intake/Mediation Center and the board’s Investigation Center closures, respectively, the total number of complaints closed prior to a field investigation per consumer services representative, and the total number of complaints closed after referral for a field investigation per investigator and special investigator. Additionally, the board shall report the total number of complaints
 closed by other board staff during the year.

(f) The number of complaints pending at the end of the fiscal year grouped in 90-day increments, and the percentage of total complaints pending, represented by the number of complaints in each grouping.

(g) The number of citations issued to licensees categorized by the type of citation such as order of correction only or order of correction and fine, and the number of citations issued to licensees that were vacated or withdrawn.

(h) The number of citations issued to nonlicensees and the number of these citations that were vacated or withdrawn.

(i) The number of complaints referred to a local prosecutor for criminal investigation or prosecution, the number of complaints referred to the Attorney General for the
 filing of an accusation, and the number of complaints referred to both a local prosecutor and the Attorney General, categorized by type of complaint, such as licensee and nonlicensee.

(j) Actions taken by the board, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) (A) The number of disciplinary actions categorized by type, such as revocations or suspensions, categorized by whether the disciplinary action resulted from an accusation, failure to comply with a citation, or failure to comply with an arbitration award.

(B) The number of disciplinary actions described in subparagraph (A) shall specify the number of disciplinary actions for violations of Section 7125.4.

(2) The number of accusations dismissed or withdrawn.

(k) For subdivisions (g) and (j), the number of cases containing violations of Sections 7121 and 7121.5, and paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 7159.5, categorized by section.

(l) The number of interim suspension orders sought, the number of interim suspension orders granted, the number of temporary restraining orders sought, and the number of temporary restraining orders granted.

(m) The amount of cost recovery ordered and the amount collected.

(n) Case aging data, including data for each major stage of the enforcement process, including the following:

(1) The average number of days from the filing of a complaint to its closure by the board’s Intake/Mediation Center prior to
 the referral for an investigation categorized by the type of complaint, such as licensee or nonlicensee.

(2) The average number of days from the referral of a complaint for an investigation to its closure by the Investigation Center categorized by the type of complaint, such as licensee or nonlicensee.

(3) The average number of days from the filing of a complaint to the referral of the completed investigation to the Attorney General.

(4) The average number of days from the referral of a completed investigation to the Attorney General to the filing of an accusation by the Attorney General.

(5) The average number of days from the filing of an accusation to the first hearing date or date of a stipulated settlement.

(6) The average number of days from the receipt of the administrative law judge’s proposed decision to the registrar’s final decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 455, Sec. 1.   (SB 291)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7017.5.

By the close of the first business day of each week, the board shall post the following home improvement salesperson registration information on its Web site:

(a) The earliest enrolled date of the unprocessed applications on file at the close of the prior business day.

(b) The earliest enrolled date of an application for which a registration number has been issued at the time of the posting required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7018.

The board shall maintain the current contractor license check search function on their internet website that permits consumers to search for a licensed contractor by either ZIP Code or geographic location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 378, Sec. 4.   (SB 610)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7019.

(a) If funding is made available for that purpose, the board may contract with licensed professionals, as appropriate, for the site investigation of consumer complaints.

(b) The board may contract with other professionals, including, but not limited to, interpreters and manufacturer’s representatives, whose skills or expertise are required to aid in the investigation or prosecution of a licensee, registrant, applicant for a license or registration, or those subject to licensure
 or registration by the board.

(c) The registrar shall determine the rate of reimbursement for those individuals providing assistance to the board pursuant to this section. All reports shall be completed on a form prescribed by the registrar.

(d) As used in this section, “licensed professionals” means, but is not limited to, engineers, architects, landscape architects, geologists, and accountants licensed, certificated, or registered pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7020.

The board shall maintain a computerized enforcement tracking system for consumer complaints.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

7021.

The board may enter into an interagency agreement with any other state or local agency the board deems to be in possession of any information relevant to its priority to protect the public described in Section 7000.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   (SB 465)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Application of Chapter [7025. - 7036.]

7025.

(a) “Members of the personnel of record” as used in this chapter means every person listed in the records of the registrar as then associated with a licensee.

(b) “Person” as used in this chapter includes an individual, a firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, federally recognized tribe, association or other organization, or any combination thereof.

(c) “Qualifying person,” “qualifying individual,” or “qualifier,” as used in this chapter, means a person who qualifies for a license pursuant to Section 7068.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 3.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7025.1.

(a) As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Federally recognized tribe” means a tribe located in this state and included on the list published in the Federal Register pursuant to the Federally Recognized Indian Tribe List Act of 1994 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 5131) and includes an entity controlled by and established for the benefit of one or more tribes.

(2) “Participating tribe” means a federally recognized tribe that formally applies for licensure from the board pursuant to Section 7065.

(b) The board shall license a federally recognized tribe that applies for licensure under Section 7065 and is
 otherwise compliant with the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of engaging in a business regulated by this chapter.

(c) This chapter is not intended to infringe upon or diminish the existing rights, privileges, and immunities of federally recognized tribes as set forth in federal, state, or tribal law, or the jurisdiction of those participating tribes.

(d) This chapter does not confer upon the board, registrar, or director any rights or authority to regulate any activity within the jurisdiction of a participating tribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 4.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7026.

“Contractor,” for the purposes of this chapter, is synonymous with “builder” and, within the meaning of this chapter, a contractor is any person who undertakes to or offers to undertake to, or purports to have the capacity to undertake to, or submits a bid to, or does himself or herself or by or through others, construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve, move, wreck or demolish any building, highway, road, parking facility, railroad, excavation or other structure, project, development or improvement, or to do any part thereof, including the erection of scaffolding or other structures or works in connection therewith, or the cleaning of grounds or structures in connection therewith, or the preparation and removal of roadway construction zones, lane closures, flagging, or traffic diversions, or the installation, repair, maintenance, or calibration of monitoring equipment for underground storage tanks, and whether or not the performance of work herein described involves the addition to, or fabrication into, any structure, project, development or improvement herein described of any material or article of merchandise. “Contractor” includes subcontractor and specialty contractor. “Roadway” includes, but is not limited to, public or city streets, highways, or any public conveyance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7026.1.

(a) The term “contractor” includes all of the following:

(1) Any person not exempt under Section 7053 who maintains or services air-conditioning, heating, or refrigeration equipment that is a fixed part of the structure to which it is attached.

(2) (A) Any person, consultant to an owner-builder, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation, or company, who or which undertakes, offers to undertake, purports to have the capacity to undertake, or submits a bid to construct any building or home improvement project, or part thereof.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, a consultant is a person, other than a public agency or an owner of privately owned real property to be improved, who meets either of the following criteria as it relates to work performed pursuant to a home improvement contract as defined in Section 7151.2:

(i) Provides or oversees a bid for a construction project.

(ii) Arranges for and sets up work schedules for contractors and subcontractors and maintains oversight of a construction project.

(3) A temporary labor service agency that, as the employer, provides employees for the performance of work covered by this chapter. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply if there is a properly licensed contractor who exercises supervision
 in accordance with Section 7068.1 and who is directly responsible for the final results of the work. Nothing in this paragraph shall require a qualifying individual, as provided in Section 7068, to be present during the supervision of work covered by this chapter. A contractor requesting the services of a temporary labor service agency shall provide his or her license number to that temporary labor service agency.

(4) Any person not otherwise exempt by this chapter, who performs tree removal, tree pruning, stump removal, or engages in tree or limb cabling or guying. The term contractor does not include a person performing the activities of a nurseryperson who in the normal course of routine work performs incidental pruning of trees, or guying of planted trees and their limbs. The term contractor does not include a gardener who in the normal course of
 routine work performs incidental pruning of trees measuring less than 15 feet in height after planting.

(5) Any person engaged in the business of drilling, digging, boring, or otherwise constructing, deepening, repairing, reperforating, or abandoning any water well, cathodic protection well, or monitoring well.

(b) The term “contractor” or “consultant” does not include a common interest development manager, as defined in Section 11501, and a common interest development manager is not required to have a contractor’s license when performing management services, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section
 11500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 319, Sec. 6.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7026.2.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, “contractor” includes any person engaged in the business of the construction, installation, alteration, repair, or preparation for moving of a mobilehome or mobilehome accessory buildings and structures upon a site for the purpose of occupancy as a dwelling. 

(b) “Contractor” does not include the manufacturer of the mobilehome or mobilehome accessory building or structure if it is constructed at a place other than the site upon which it is installed for the purpose of occupancy as a dwelling, and does not include the manufacturer when the manufacturer is solely performing work in compliance with the manufacturer’s warranty. “Contractor” includes the manufacturer if the manufacturer is engaged in onsite construction, alteration, or repair of a mobilehome or mobilehome accessory buildings and structures pursuant to specialized plans, specifications, or models, or any work other than in compliance with the manufacturer’s warranty. 

(c) “Contractor” does not include a seller of a manufactured home or mobilehome who holds a retail manufactured home or mobilehome dealer’s license under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 18045) of Part 2 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, if the installation of the manufactured home or mobilehome is to be performed by a licensed contractor and the seller certifies that fact in writing to the buyer prior to the performance of the installation. The certification shall include the name, business address, and contractor’s license number of the licensed contractor by whom the installation will be performed. 

(d) For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings: 

(1) “Mobilehome” means a vehicle defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(2) “Mobilehome accessory building or structure” means a building or structure defined in Section 18008.5 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(3) “Manufactured home” means a structure defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7027 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

7026.3.

For the purpose of this chapter, “contractor” includes any person who installs or contracts for the installation of carpet wherein the carpet is attached to the structure by any conventional method as determined by custom and usage in the trade; except that a seller of installed carpet who holds a retail furniture dealer’s license under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) of Division 8 shall not be required to have a contractor’s license if the installation of the carpet is performed by a licensed contractor and the seller so certifies in writing to the buyer prior to the performance of the installation, which certification shall include the name, business address, and contractor’s license number of the licensed contractor by whom the installation will be performed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

7026.11.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the permissible scope of work for the General Manufactured Housing Contractor (C-47) license classification set forth in Section 832.47 of Division 8 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations shall include manufactured homes, as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, mobilehomes, as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code, and multifamily manufactured homes, as defined in Section 18008.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 540, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7026.12.

Except as provided in Section 7026.13, the installation of a fire protection system, excluding an electrical alarm system, shall be performed only by either of the following:

(a) A contractor holding a fire protection contractor classification, as defined in the regulations of the board.

(b) An owner-builder of an owner-occupied, single-family dwelling, if not more than two single-family dwellings on the same parcel are constructed within one year, plans are submitted to, and approved by, the city, county, or city and county authority, and the city, county, or city and county authority inspects and approves the
 installation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 377, Sec. 1.   (AB 433)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7027.

Any person who advertises or puts out any sign or card or other device that would indicate to the public that he or she is a contractor, or who causes his or her name or business name to be included in a classified advertisement or directory under a classification for construction or work of improvement covered by this chapter is subject to the provisions of this chapter regardless of whether his or her operations as a builder are otherwise exempted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 8.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7027.1.

(a) It is a misdemeanor for any person to advertise for construction or work of improvement covered by this chapter unless that person holds a valid license under this chapter in the classification so advertised, except that a licensed building or engineering contractor may advertise as a general contractor. 

(b) “Advertise,” as used in this section, includes, but not by way of limitation, the issuance of any card, sign, or device to any person, the causing, permitting, or allowing of any sign or marking on or in any building or structure, or in any newspaper, magazine, or by airwave or any electronic transmission, or in any directory under a listing for construction or work of improvement covered by this chapter, with or without any limiting qualifications.

(c) A violation of this section is punishable by a fine of not less than seven hundred dollars ($700) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), which fine shall be in addition to any other punishment imposed for a violation of this section. 

(d) If upon investigation, the registrar has probable cause to believe that an unlicensed individual is in violation of this section, the registrar may issue a citation pursuant to Section 7028.7 or 7099.10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7027.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person who is not licensed pursuant to this chapter may advertise for construction work or a work of improvement covered by this chapter only if the aggregate contract price for labor, material, and all other items on a project or undertaking is less than one thousand dollars
 ($1,000) and the person states in the advertisement that the person is not licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 240, Sec. 1.   (AB 2622)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7027.3.

Any person, licensed or unlicensed, who willfully and intentionally uses, with intent to defraud, a contractor’s license number that does not correspond to the number on a currently valid contractor’s license held by that person, is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in state prison, or in county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. The penalty provided by this section is cumulative to the penalties available under all other laws of this state. If, upon investigation, the registrar has probable cause to believe that an unlicensed individual is in violation of this section, the registrar may issue a citation pursuant to Section 7028.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 728, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7027.4.

(a) It is a cause for discipline for any contractor to advertise that he or she is “insured” or has insurance without identifying in the advertisement the type of insurance, including, for example, “commercial general liability insurance” or “workers’ compensation insurance” that is carried by the contractor. The contractor may abbreviate the title of the type of insurance.

(b) It is cause for discipline for a contractor to advertise that he or she is “bonded” if the reference is to a contractor’s license bond required pursuant to Section 7071.6 or to a disciplinary bond required pursuant to Section 7071.8.

(c) “Advertise,” as used in this section, includes, but is not limited to, the issuance of any card, sign, or device to any person, the causing, permitting, or allowing of any sign or marking on or in any building or structure or business vehicle or in any newspaper, magazine, or by airwave or any electronic transmission, or in any directory under a listing for construction or work of improvement covered by this chapter, for the direct or indirect purpose of performing or offering to perform services that require a contractor’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7027.5.

(a) A landscape contractor working within the classification for which the license is issued may design systems or facilities for work to be performed and supervised by that contractor.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a landscape contractor working within the classification for which the license is issued may enter into a prime contract for the construction of any of the following:

(1) A swimming pool, spa, or hot tub, provided that the improvements are included within the landscape project that the landscape contractor is
 supervising and the construction of any swimming pool, spa, or hot tub is subcontracted to a single licensed contractor holding a Swimming Pool (C-53) classification, as set forth in Section 832.53 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, or performed by the landscape contractor if the landscape contractor also holds a Swimming Pool (C-53) classification. The contractor constructing the swimming pool, spa, or hot tub may subcontract with other appropriately licensed contractors for the completion of individual components of the construction.

(2) An outdoor cooking center, provided that the improvements are included within a residential landscape project that the contractor is supervising. For purposes of this subdivision, “outdoor cooking center” means an unenclosed area within a landscape that is used for the cooking or
 preparation of food or beverages.

(3) An outdoor fireplace, provided that it is included within a residential landscape project that the contractor is supervising and is not attached to a dwelling.

(4) A rainwater capture system, as defined in Section 10573 of the Water Code, used exclusively for landscape irrigation or as a water supply for a fountain, pond, or similar decorative water feature in a landscaping project.

(c) (1) Work performed in connection with a landscape project specified in paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (b) that is outside of the field and scope of activities authorized to be performed under the Landscape Contractor (C-27) classification, as set forth in Section
 832.27 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, may only be performed by a landscape contractor if the landscape contractor also either holds an appropriate specialty license classification to perform the work or is licensed as a General Building contractor. If the landscape contractor neither holds an appropriate specialty license classification to perform the work nor is licensed as a General Building contractor, the work shall be performed by a Specialty contractor holding the appropriate license classification or by a General Building contractor performing work in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 7057.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a landscape contractor performing work under the Landscape Contractor (C-27) classification, as set forth in Section 832.27 of Title 16 of the California Code of
 Regulations, may design and install all exterior components of a rainwater capture system, as defined in Section
 10573 of the Water Code, that are not a part of, or attached to, a structure.

(d) A violation of this section shall be cause for disciplinary action.

(e) Nothing in this section authorizes a landscape contractor to engage in or perform activities that require a license pursuant to the Professional Engineers Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 537, Sec. 1.   (AB 1750)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.

(a) Unless exempted from this chapter, it is a misdemeanor for a person to engage in the business of, or act in the capacity of, a contractor within this state under either of the following conditions:

(1) The person is not licensed in accordance with this chapter.

(2) The person performs acts covered by this chapter under a license that is under suspension for failure to pay a civil penalty or to comply with an order of correction, pursuant to Section 7090.1, or for failure to resolve all outstanding final liabilities, pursuant to Section 7145.5.

(b) A first
 conviction for the offense described in this section is punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) If a person has been previously convicted of the offense described in this section, unless the provisions of subdivision (d) are applicable, the court shall impose a fine of 20 percent of the contract price, or 20 percent of the aggregate payments made to, or at the direction of, the unlicensed person, or five thousand dollars ($5,000), whichever is greater, and, unless the sentence prescribed in subdivision (d) is imposed, the person shall be confined in a county jail for not less than 90 days, except in an unusual case where the interests of justice would be served by imposition of a lesser sentence or a fine. If the
 court imposes only a fine or a jail sentence of less than 90 days for second or subsequent convictions under this section, the court shall state the reasons for its sentencing choice on the record.

(d) A third or subsequent conviction for the offense described in this section is punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than the greater amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or 20 percent of the contract price, or 20 percent of the aggregate payments made to, or at the direction of, the unlicensed person, and by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or less than 90 days. The penalty provided by this subdivision is cumulative to the penalties available under all other laws of this state.

(e) A person who violates this
 section is subject to the penalties prescribed in subdivision (d) if the person was named on a license that was previously revoked and, either in fact or under law, was held responsible for any act or omission resulting in the revocation.

(f) If the unlicensed person engaging in the business of or acting in the capacity of a contractor has agreed to furnish materials and labor on an hourly basis, “the contract price” for the purposes of this section means the aggregate sum of the cost of materials and labor furnished and the cost of completing the work to be performed.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, an indictment for any violation of this section by an unlicensed person shall be found, or information or a complaint shall be filed, within four years from the date of the
 contract proposal, contract, completion, or abandonment of the work, whichever occurs last.

(h) For any conviction under this section, a person who utilized the services of the unlicensed person is a victim of crime and is eligible, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code, for restitution for economic losses, regardless of whether he or she had knowledge that the person was unlicensed.

(i) The changes made to this section by the act adding this subdivision are declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 392, Sec. 3.   (SB 315)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.1.

It is a misdemeanor for any contractor, whether licensed or unlicensed, to perform or engage in asbestos-related work, as defined in Section 6501.8 of the Labor Code, without certification pursuant to Section 7058.5 of this code, or to perform or engage in a removal or remedial action, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 7058.7, or, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter, to bid for the installation or removal of, or to install or remove, an underground storage tank, without certification pursuant to Section 7058.7. A contractor in violation of this section is subject to one of the following penalties:

(a) Conviction of a first offense is punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), and by possible revocation or suspension of any contractor’s license.

(b) Conviction of a subsequent offense requires a fine of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or both the fine and imprisonment, and a mandatory action to suspend or revoke any contractor’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 865, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.2.

A criminal complaint pursuant to this chapter may be brought by the Attorney General or by the district attorney or prosecuting attorney of any city, in any county in the state with jurisdiction over the contractor or employer, by reason of the contractor’s or employer’s act, or failure to act, within that jurisdiction. Any penalty assessed by the court shall be paid to the office of the prosecutor bringing the complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 8.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.3.

In addition to all other remedies, when it appears to the registrar, either upon complaint or otherwise, that a licensee has engaged in, or is engaging in, any act, practice, or transaction which constitutes a violation of this chapter whereby another person may be substantially injured, or that any person, who does not hold a state contractor’s license in any classification, has engaged in, or is engaging in, any act, practice, or transaction which constitutes a violation of this chapter, whether or not there is substantial injury, the registrar may, either through the Attorney General or through the district attorney of the county in which the act, practice, or transaction is alleged to have been committed, apply to the superior court of that county or any other county in which such person maintains a place of business or resides, for an injunction restraining such person from acting in the capacity of a contractor without a license in violation of this chapter, or from acting in violation of this chapter when another person may be substantially injured, and, upon a proper showing, a temporary restraining order, a preliminary injunction, or a permanent injunction shall be granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.4.

In addition to the remedies set forth in Section 7028.3, on proper showing by (1) a licensed contractor, or an association of contractors, (2) a consumer affected by the violation, (3) a district attorney, or (4) the Attorney General, of a continuing violation of this chapter by a person who does not hold a state contractor’s license in any classification, an injunction shall issue by a court specified in Section 7028.3 at the request of any such party, prohibiting such violation. The plaintiff in any such action shall not be required to prove irreparable injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

7028.5.
